Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 12.1 Uniform Partnership Act [Effective January 1, 2023.]
7-12.1-204.
When property is partnership property. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Property is partnership property if acquired in the name of:

The partnership; or

One or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership but without an indication of the name of the partnership.

Property is acquired in the name of the partnership by a transfer to:

The partnership in its name; or

One or more partners in their capacity as partners in the partnership, if the name of the partnership is indicated in the instrument transferring title to the property.

Property is presumed to be partnership property if purchased with partnership assets, even if not acquired in the name of the partnership or of one or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership.

Property acquired in the name of one or more of the partners, without an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership and without use of partnership assets, is presumed to be separate property, even if used for partnership purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-301.
Partner agent of partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under §

7-12.1-303

, the following rules apply:

Each partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its business. An act of a partner, including the signing of an instrument in the partnership name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership, unless the partner did not have authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter and the person with which the partner was dealing knew or had notice that the partner lacked authority.

An act of a partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership’s business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership only if the act was actually authorized by all the other partners.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-302.
Transfer of partnership property. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Partnership property may be transferred as follows:

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under §

7-12.1-303

, partnership property held in the name of the partnership may be transferred by an instrument of transfer signed by a partner in the partnership name;

Partnership property held in the name of one or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, but without an indication of the name of the partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer signed by the persons in whose name the property is held; or

Partnership property held in the name of one or more persons other than the partnership, without an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer signed by the persons in whose name the property is held.

A partnership may recover partnership property from a transferee only if it proves that signing of the instrument of initial transfer did not bind the partnership under §

7-12.1-301

and:

As to a subsequent transferee who gave value for property transferred under subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section, proves that the subsequent transferee knew or had been notified that the person who signed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership; or

As to a transferee who gave value for property transferred under subsection (a)(3) of this section, proves that the transferee knew or had been notified that the property was partnership property and that the person who signed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership.

A partnership may not recover partnership property from a subsequent transferee if the partnership would not have been entitled to recover the property, under subsection (b) of this section, from any earlier transferee of the property.

If a person holds all the partners’ interests in the partnership, all the partnership property vests in that person. The person may sign a record in the name of the partnership to evidence vesting of the property in that person and may file or record the record.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-303.
Statement of partnership authority. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of partnership authority. The statement:

Must include the name of the partnership and:

If the partnership is not a limited liability partnership, the street and mailing addresses of its principal office; or

If the partnership is a limited liability partnership, the name and street and mailing addresses of its registered agent;

With respect to any position that exists in or with respect to the partnership, may state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of all persons holding the position to:

Sign an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the partnership; or

Enter into other transactions on behalf of, or otherwise act for or bind, the partnership; and

May state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of a specific person to:

Sign an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the partnership; or

Enter into other transactions on behalf of, or otherwise act for or bind, the partnership.

To amend or cancel a statement of authority filed by the secretary of state, a partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment or cancellation stating:

The name of the partnership;

If the partnership is not a limited liability partnership, the street and mailing addresses of the partnership’s principal office;

If the partnership is a limited liability partnership, the name and street and mailing addresses of its registered agent;

The date the statement being affected became effective; and

The contents of the amendment or a declaration that the statement is canceled.

A statement of authority affects only the power of a person to bind a partnership to persons that are not partners.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section and §

7-12.1-103(d)(1)

, and except as otherwise provided in subsections (f), (g), and (h) of this section, a limitation on the authority of a person or a position contained in an effective statement of authority is not by itself evidence of any person’s knowledge or notice of the limitation.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a grant of authority not pertaining to transfers of real property and contained in an effective statement of authority is conclusive in favor of a person that gives value in reliance on the grant, except to the extent that if the person gives value:

The person has knowledge to the contrary;

The statement has been canceled or restrictively amended under subsection (b) of this section; or

A limitation on the grant is contained in another statement of authority that became effective after the statement containing the grant became effective.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, an effective statement of authority that grants authority to transfer real property held in the name of the partnership, a certified copy of which statement is recorded in the office for recording transfers of the real property, is conclusive in favor of a person that gives value in reliance on the grant without knowledge to the contrary, except to the extent that when the person gives value:

The statement has been canceled or restrictively amended under subsection (b) of this section, and a certified copy of the cancellation or restrictive amendment has been recorded in the office for recording transfers of the real property; or

A limitation on the grant is contained in another statement of authority that became effective after the statement containing the grant became effective, and a certified copy of the later-effective statement is recorded in the office for recording transfers of the real property.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if a certified copy of an effective statement containing a limitation on the authority to transfer real property held in the name of a partnership is recorded in the office for recording transfers of that real property, all persons are deemed to know of the limitation.

Subject to subsection (i) of this section, an effective statement of dissolution is a cancellation of any filed statement of authority for the purposes of subsection (f) of this section and is a limitation on authority for purposes of subsection (g) of this section.

After a statement of dissolution becomes effective, a partnership may deliver to the secretary of state for filing and, if appropriate, may record a statement of authority that is designated as a post-dissolution statement of authority. The statement operates as provided in subsections (f) and (g) of this section.

Unless canceled earlier, an effective statement of authority is canceled by operation of law five (5) years after the date on which the statement, or its most recent amendment, becomes effective. The cancellation is effective without recording under subsection (f) or (g) of this section.

An effective statement of denial operates as a restrictive amendment under this section and may be recorded by certified copy for purposes of subsection (f)(1) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-304.
Statement of denial. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person named in a filed statement of authority granting that person authority may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of denial that:

Provides the name of the partnership and the caption of the statement of authority to which the statement of denial pertains; and

Denies the grant of authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-305.
Partnership liable for partner’s actionable conduct. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a partner acting in the ordinary course of business of the partnership or with the actual or apparent authority of the partnership.

If, in the course of the partnership’s business or while acting with actual or apparent authority of the partnership, a partner receives or causes the partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a partner, the partnership is liable for the loss.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-306.
Partner’s liability. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, all partners are liable jointly and severally for all debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

A person that becomes a partner is not personally liable for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership incurred before the person became a partner.

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a partnership incurred while the partnership is a limited liability partnership is solely the debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability partnership. A partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability partnership solely by reason of being or acting as a partner. This subsection applies:

Despite anything inconsistent in the partnership agreement that existed immediately before the vote or consent required to become a limited liability partnership under §

7-12.1-901(b)

; and

Regardless of the dissolution of the limited liability partnership.

The failure of a limited liability partnership to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its business is not a ground for imposing liability on a partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership.

The cancellation or administrative revocation of a limited liability partnership’s statement of qualification does not affect the limitation in this section on the liability of a partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership incurred while the statement was in effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-307.
Actions by and against partnership and partners. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership may sue and be sued in the name of the partnership.

To the extent not inconsistent with §

7-12.1-306

, a partner may be joined in an action against the partnership or named in a separate action.

A judgment against a partnership is not by itself a judgment against a partner. A judgment against a partnership may not be satisfied from a partner’s assets unless there is also a judgment against the partner.

A judgment creditor of a partner may not levy execution against the assets of the partner to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the partnership unless the partner is personally liable for the claim under §

7-12.1-306

and:

A judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the partnership and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

The partnership is a debtor in bankruptcy;

The partner has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust partnership assets;

A court grants permission to the judgment creditor to levy execution against the assets of a partner based on a finding that partnership assets subject to execution are clearly insufficient to satisfy the judgment, that exhaustion of partnership assets is excessively burdensome, or that the grant of permission is an appropriate exercise of the court’s equitable powers; or

Liability is imposed on the partner by law or contract independent of the existence of the partnership.

This section applies to any debt, liability, or other obligation of a partnership which results from a representation by a partner or purported partner under §

7-12.1-308

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-308.
Liability of purported partner. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a person, by words or conduct, purports to be a partner, or consents to being represented by another as a partner, in a partnership or with one or more persons not partners, the purported partner is liable to a person to whom the representation is made, if that person, relying on the representation, enters into a transaction with the actual or purported partnership. If the representation, either by the purported partner or by a person with the purported partner’s consent, is made in a public manner, the purported partner is liable to a person who relies upon the purported partnership even if the purported partner is not aware of being held out as a partner to the claimant. If partnership liability results, the purported partner is liable with respect to that liability as if the purported partner were a partner. If no partnership liability results, the purported partner is liable with respect to that liability jointly and severally with any other person consenting to the representation.

If a person is thus represented to be a partner in an existing partnership, or with one or more persons not partners, the purported partner is an agent of persons consenting to the representation to bind them to the same extent and in the same manner as if the purported partner were a partner with respect to persons who enter into transactions in reliance upon the representation. If all the partners of the existing partnership consent to the representation, a partnership act or obligation results. If fewer than all the partners of the existing partnership consent to the representation, the person acting and the partners consenting to the representation are jointly and severally liable.

A person is not liable as a partner merely because the person is named by another as a partner in a statement of partnership authority.

A person does not continue to be liable as a partner merely because of a failure to file a statement of dissociation or to amend a statement of partnership authority to indicate the person’s dissociation as a partner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, persons who are not partners as to each other are not liable as partners to other persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-401.
Partner’s rights and duties. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Each partner is entitled to an equal share of the partnership distributions and, except in the case of a limited liability partnership, is chargeable with a share of the partnership losses in proportion to the partner’s share of the distributions.

A partnership shall reimburse a partner for any payment made by the partner in the course of the partner’s activities on behalf of the partnership, if the partner complied with this section and §

7-12.1-409

in making the payment.

A partnership shall indemnify and hold harmless a person with respect to any claim or demand against the person and any debt, obligation, or other liability incurred by the person by reason of the person’s former or present capacity as a partner, if the claim, demand, debt, obligation, or other liability does not arise from the person’s breach of this section or §

7-12.1-407

or

7-12.1-409

.

In the ordinary course of its business, a partnership may advance reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees and costs, incurred by a person in connection with a claim or demand against the person by reason of the person’s former or present capacity as a partner, if the person promises to repay the partnership if the person ultimately is determined not to be entitled to be indemnified under subsection (c) of this section.

A partnership may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a partner against liability asserted against or incurred by the partner in that capacity or arising from that status even if, under §

7-12.1-105(c)(7)

, the partnership agreement could not eliminate or limit the person’s liability to the partnership for the conduct giving rise to the liability.

A partnership shall reimburse a partner for an advance to the partnership beyond the amount of capital the partner agreed to contribute.

A payment or advance made by a partner which gives rise to a partnership obligation under subsection (b) or (f) of this section constitutes a loan to the partnership which accrues interest from the date of the payment or advance.

Each partner has equal rights in the management and conduct of the partnership’s business.

A partner may use or possess partnership property only on behalf of the partnership.

A partner is not entitled to remuneration for services performed for the partnership, except for reasonable compensation for services rendered in winding up the business of the partnership.

A difference arising as to a matter in the ordinary course of business of a partnership may be decided by a majority of the partners. An act outside the ordinary course of business of a partnership and an amendment to the partnership agreement may be undertaken only with the affirmative vote or consent of all the partners.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-402.
Becoming partner. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Upon formation of a partnership, a person becomes a partner under §

7-12.1-202(a)

.

After formation of a partnership, a person becomes a partner:

As provided in the partnership agreement;

As a result of a transaction effective under Article 11 of this chapter; or

With the affirmative vote or consent of all the partners.

A person may become a partner without:

Acquiring a transferable interest; or

Making or being obligated to make a contribution to the partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-403.
Form of contribution. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A contribution may consist of property transferred to, services performed for, or another benefit provided to the partnership or an agreement to transfer property to, perform services for, or provide another benefit to the partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-404.
Liability for contribution. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person’s obligation to make a contribution to a partnership is not excused by the person’s death, disability, termination, or other inability to perform personally.

If a person does not fulfill an obligation to make a contribution other than money, the person is obligated at the option of the partnership to contribute money equal to the value of the part of the contribution which has not been made.

The obligation of a person to make a contribution may be compromised only by the affirmative vote or consent of all the partners. If a creditor of a limited liability partnership extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subsection (a) of this section without knowledge or notice of a compromise under this subsection, the creditor may enforce the obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-405.
Sharing of and right to distributions before dissolution. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Any distribution made by a partnership before its dissolution and winding up must be in equal shares among partners, except to the extent necessary to comply with a transfer effective under §

7-12.1-503

or charging order in effect under §

7-12.1-504

.

Subject to §

7-12.1-701

, a person has a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a partnership only if the partnership decides to make an interim distribution.

A person does not have a right to demand or receive a distribution from a partnership in any form other than money. Except as otherwise provided in §

7-12.1-806

, a partnership may distribute an asset in kind only if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each person receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the person’s share of distributions.

If a partner or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the partnership with respect to the distribution. However, the partnership’s obligation to make a distribution is subject to offset for any amount owed to the partnership by the partner or a person dissociated as partner on whose account the distribution is made.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-406.
Limitations on distributions by limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited liability partnership may not make a distribution, including a distribution under §

7-12.1-806

, if after the distribution:

The partnership would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the partnership’s business; or

The partnership’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the partnership were to be dissolved and wound up at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution and winding up of partners and transferees whose preferential rights are superior to the rights of persons receiving the distribution.

A limited liability partnership may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (a) of this section on:

Financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances; or

A fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, the effect of a distribution under subsection (a) of this section is measured:

In the case of a distribution as defined in §

7-12.1-102(5)(i)

, as of the earlier of:

The date money or other property is transferred or debt is incurred by the limited liability partnership; or

The date the person entitled to the distribution ceases to own the interest or rights being acquired by the partnership in return for the distribution;

In the case of any other distribution of indebtedness, as of the date the indebtedness is distributed; and

In all other cases, as of the date:

The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after that date; or

The payment is made, if the payment occurs more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the distribution is authorized.

A limited liability partnership’s indebtedness to a partner or transferee incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the partnership’s indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors, except to the extent subordinated by agreement.

A limited liability partnership’s indebtedness, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, is not a liability for purposes of subsection (a) of this section if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest is made only if and to the extent that a payment of a distribution could then be made under this section. If the indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

In measuring the effect of a distribution under §

7-12.1-806

, the liabilities of a dissolved limited liability partnership do not include any claim that has been disposed of under §

7-12.1-807

,

7-12.1-808

, or

7-12.1-809

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-407.
Liability for improper distributions by limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, if a partner of a limited liability partnership consents to a distribution made in violation of §

7-12.1-406

and in consenting to the distribution fails to comply with §

7-12.1-409

, the partner is personally liable to the partnership for the amount of the distribution which exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation of §

7-12.1-406

.

To the extent the partnership agreement of a limited liability partnership expressly relieves a partner of the authority and responsibility to consent to distributions and imposes that authority and responsibility on one or more other partners, the liability stated in subsection (a) of this section applies to the other partners and not to the partner that the partnership agreement relieves of the authority and responsibility.

A person that receives a distribution knowing that the distribution violated §

7-12.1-406

is personally liable to the limited liability partnership but only to the extent that the distribution received by the person exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under §

7-12.1-406

.

A person against which an action is commenced because the person is liable under subsection (a) of this section may:

Implead any other person that is liable under subsection (a) of this section and seek to enforce a right of contribution from the person; and

Implead any person that received a distribution in violation of subsection (c) of this section and seek to enforce a right of contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation of subsection (c) of this section.

An action under this section is barred unless commenced not later than two (2) years after the distribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-408.
Rights to information of partners and persons dissociated as partner. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership shall keep its books and records, if any, at its principal office.

On reasonable notice, a partner may inspect and copy during regular business hours, at a reasonable location specified by the partnership, any record maintained by the partnership regarding the partnership’s business, financial condition, and other circumstances, to the extent the information is material to the partner’s rights and duties under the partnership agreement or this chapter.

The partnership shall furnish to each partner:

Without demand, any information concerning the partnership’s business, financial condition, and other circumstances which the partnership knows and is material to the proper exercise of the partner’s rights and duties under the partnership agreement or this chapter, except to the extent the partnership can establish that it reasonably believes the partner already knows the information; and

On demand, any other information concerning the partnership’s business, financial condition, and other circumstances, except to the extent the demand or the information demanded is unreasonable or otherwise improper under the circumstances.

The duty to furnish information under subsection (c) of this section also applies to each partner to the extent the partner knows any of the information described in subsection (c) of this section.

Subject to subsection (j) of this section, on ten (10) days’ demand made in a record received by a partnership, a person dissociated as a partner may have access to information to which the person was entitled while a partner if:

The information pertains to the period during which the person was a partner;

The person seeks the information in good faith; and

The person satisfies the requirements imposed on a partner by subsection (b) of this section.

Not later than ten (10) days after receiving a demand under subsection (e) of this section, the partnership in a record shall inform the person that made the demand of:

The information that the partnership will provide in response to the demand and when and where the partnership will provide the information; and

The partnership’s reasons for declining, if the partnership declines to provide any demanded information.

A partnership may charge a person that makes a demand under this section the reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

A partner or person dissociated as a partner may exercise the rights under this section through an agent or, in the case of an individual under legal disability, a legal representative. Any restriction or condition imposed by the partnership agreement or under subsection (j) of this section applies both to the agent or legal representative and to the partner or person dissociated as a partner.

Subject to §

7-12.1-505

, the rights under this section do not extend to a person as transferee.

In addition to any restriction or condition stated in its partnership agreement, a partnership, as a matter within the ordinary course of its business, may impose reasonable restrictions and conditions on access to and use of information to be furnished under this section, including designating information confidential and imposing nondisclosure and safeguarding obligations on the recipient. In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subsection, the partnership has the burden of proving reasonableness.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-409.
Standards of conduct for partners. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partner owes to the partnership and the other partners the duties of loyalty and care stated in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

The fiduciary duty of loyalty of a partner includes the duties:

To account to the partnership and hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the partner:

In the conduct or winding up of the partnership’s business;

From a use by the partner of the partnership’s property; or

From the appropriation of a partnership opportunity;

To refrain from dealing with the partnership in the conduct or winding up of the partnership business as or on behalf of a person having an interest adverse to the partnership; and

To refrain from competing with the partnership in the conduct of the partnership’s business before the dissolution of the partnership.

The duty of care of a partner in the conduct or winding up of the partnership business is to refrain from engaging in grossly negligent or reckless conduct, willful or intentional misconduct, or a knowing violation of law.

A partner shall discharge the duties and obligations under this chapter or under the partnership agreement and exercise any rights consistently with the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

A partner does not violate a duty or obligation under this chapter or under the partnership agreement solely because the partner’s conduct furthers the partner’s own interest.

All the partners may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction by a partner that otherwise would violate the duty of loyalty.

It is a defense to a claim under subsection (b)(2) of this section and any comparable claim in equity or at common law that the transaction was fair to the partnership.

If, as permitted by subsection (f) of this section or the partnership agreement, a partner enters into a transaction with the partnership which otherwise would be prohibited by subsection (b)(2) of this section, the partner’s rights and obligations arising from the transaction are the same as those of a person that is not a partner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-410.
Actions by partnership and partners. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership may maintain an action against a partner for a breach of the partnership agreement, or for the violation of a duty to the partnership, causing harm to the partnership.

A partner may maintain an action against the partnership or another partner, with or without an accounting as to partnership business, to enforce the partner’s rights and protect the partner’s interests, including rights and interests under the partnership agreement or this chapter or arising independently of the partnership relationship.

A right to an accounting on dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-411.
Continuation of partnership beyond definite term or particular undertaking. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking is continued, without an express agreement, after the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, the rights and duties of the partners remain the same as they were at the expiration or completion, so far as is consistent with a partnership at will.

If the partners, or those of them who habitually acted in the business during the term or undertaking, continue the business without any settlement or liquidation of the partnership, they are presumed to have agreed that the partnership will continue.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-501.
Partner not co-owner of partnership property. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partner is not a co-owner of partnership property and has no interest in partnership property which can be transferred, either voluntarily or involuntarily.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-502.
Nature of transferable interest. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A transferable interest is personal property.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-503.
Transfer of transferable interest. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a transferable interest:

Is permissible;

Does not by itself cause a person’s dissociation as a partner or a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business; and

Subject to §

7-12.1-505

, does not entitle the transferee to:

Participate in the management or conduct of the partnership’s business; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, have access to records or other information concerning the partnership’s business.

A transferee has the right to:

Receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled; and

Seek under §

7-12.1-801(5)

a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business.

In a dissolution and winding up of a partnership, a transferee is entitled to an account of the partnership’s transactions only from the date of dissolution.

A partnership need not give effect to a transferee’s rights under this section until the partnership knows or has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of a transferable interest in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective if the intended transferee has knowledge or notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

Except as otherwise provided in §

7-12.1-601(4)(ii)

, if a partner transfers a transferable interest, the transferor retains the rights of a partner other than the transferable interest transferred and retains all the duties and obligations of a partner.

If a partner transfers a transferable interest to a person that becomes a partner with respect to the transferred interest, the transferee is liable for the partner’s obligations under §§

7-12.1-404

and

7-12.1-407

known to the transferee when the transferee becomes a partner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.